th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ที่จัดเก็บและบรรทุกของบนรถ > แร็คบรรทุกของบนรถ: ระบบชั้นฐานสำหรับยานพาหนะ; ชั้นวางจักรยานของรถยนต์; ชั้นวางเรือสำหรับยานพาหนะ; แร็คหลังคารถยนต์; ชั้นวางคันเบ็ดสำหรับยานพาหนะ; ชั้นวางปืนสำหรับรถยนต์; ชั้นวางสำหรับมอเตอร์ไซต์และสกูทเตอร์; ชั้นวางสกีและสโนว์บอร์ดสำหรับยานพาหนะ; ชั้นวางบอร์ดกีฬาทางน้ำสำหรับยานพาหนะ
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Almacenamiento y carga de vehículos > Portaequipajes para vehículos motorizados: Sistemas de base de portaequipajes; Portabicicletas para vehículos; Portaequipajes para embarcaciones; Portacargas para vehículos; Portacañas para vehículos; Armeros para vehículos; Portaequipajes para motocicletas y escúteres; Portaesquís y portaequipajes para tablas de snowboard; Portaequipajes para tablas de surf
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Khoang lưu giữ và chở hàng của xe > Giá chở đồ cho xe cơ giới: Hệ thống giá đỡ chịu tải chính; Giá đỡ xe đạp cho xe cơ giới; Giá đỡ gắn trên xe để vận chuyển thuyền; Giá chở đồ trên xe; Giá đỡ gắn trên xe để vận chuyển cần câu cá; Giáo treo súng trên ô tô; Giá đỡ gắn trên xe dành cho xe máy; Thanh đỡ gắn trên xe cho ván trượt tuyết; Thanh đỡ gắn nóc xe cho ván trượt thể thao dưới nước
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Auton säilytys- ja kuormaratkaisut > Moottoriajoneuvojen tavaratelineet: Auton kattotelineet; Auton polkupyörätelineet; Auton venetelineet; Auton kuljetuslaatikot; Auton vapatelineet; Auton asetelineet; Auton moottoripyörä- ja skootteritelineet; Auton suksi- ja lumilautatelineet; Auton vesiurheilulautatelineet
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Lagring og last til køretøjer > Holder til tagboks til motorkøretøjer: Tagholdersystemer til køretøjer; Cykelholdere til køretøjer; Kano- og kajakholdere til motorkøretøjer; Bagageholdere til køretøjer; Fiskestangsholdere til motorkøretøjer; Geværstativ til køretøjer; Motorcykel- og scooterholdere til køretøjer; Ski- og snowboardholdere til køretøjer; Reoler til vandsportsbrætter
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Shranjevanje tovora in opreme v vozilih > Nosilci za vozila: Osnovni sistem nosilcev za vozila; Nosilci za kolesa za vozila; Nosilci za čolne za vozila; Nosilci za prevoz tovora za vozila; Nosilci za ribiške palice za vozila; Nosilci za orožje za vozila; Nosilci za motorna kolesa in skuterje za vozila; Nosilci za smuči in snežne deske za vozila; Stojala za deske za vodne športe za vozila
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Lastförvaring i fordon > Lasthållare för fordon: Lasthållarsystem för fordon; Cykelhållare för fordon; Kanot- och kajakhållare för fordon; Förvaringshållare för fordon; Metspöställ för fordon; Vapenställ för motorfordon; Motorcykel- och skoterställ för fordon; Skid- och snowboardställ för fordon; Hållare av vattensportbrädor för fordon
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Přeprava nákladů pomocí vozidel > Nosiče pro motorová vozidla: Základní střešní nosiče; Nosiče na jízdní kola; Nosiče na lodě pro vozidla; Střešní nosiče pro vozidla; Nosiče na rybářské pruty pro vozidla; Držáky na zbraně do vozidel; Nosiče na motocykly a skútry; Nosiče na lyže a snowboardy; Nosiče na surfy
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Depozitare și încărcătură pentru vehicule > Suporturi transport pentru autovehicule: Sisteme suport bază vehicule; Suporturi biciclete pentru vehicule; Suporturi ambarcațiuni pentru vehicule; Suporturi marfă autovehicule; Suporturi lansete pentru autovehicule; Suporturi arme de foc pentru autovehicule; Suporturi scutere și motociclete pentru autovehicule; Suporturi schiuri și plăci de snowboarding pentru autovehicule; Suporturi plăci pentru sporturi nautice pentru autovehicule
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Járműtárolás és -rakomány > Gépjárműállvány-kiegészítők: Járműalapállvány-rendszerek; Járműkerékpár-állványok; Járműhajóállványok; Járműrakomány-állványok; Járműhorgászbot-állványok; Járműfegyver-állványok; Járműmotorkerékpár- és robogó-állványok; Járműsí- és snowboardállványok; Járművízisportdeszka-állványok
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Billagring og -last > Lastestativer for kjøretøy: Grunnstativsystemer for bil; Sykkelstativer for bil; Båtstativer for bil; Lastestativer for bil; Fiskestangstativer for bil; Våpenstativer for bil; Motorsykkel- og scooterstativer for bil; Ski- og snowboardstativer for bil; Vannsportbrettstativer for bil
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Stoccaggio e carico per veicoli > Portapacchi per veicoli a motore: Sistemi rack base per veicoli; Portabiciclette per veicoli; Barre portatutto per natanti; Box portatutto per veicoli; Porta canne da pesca per veicoli; Rastrelliera per armi da fuoco per veicoli; Portamoto e portascooter per veicoli; Portasci e portasnowboard per veicoli; Portatavola da surf per veicoli
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Багажници и товарни отделения за превозни средства > Багажни стойки за моторни превозни средства: Греди за багажници на превозни средства; Багажници за велосипеди за превозни средства; Багажници за лодки за превозни средства; Багажници за превозни средства; Риболовни багажници за превозни средства; Стойки за оръжия за превозни средства; Багажници за мотоциклети и скутери за превозни средства; Багажници за ски и сноуборд за превозни средства; Багажници за водни спортове
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 乗り物用収納ボックス > 車載用ラック・キャリア: 車載用ベースラックシステム; 車載用サイクルキャリア; 車載用カヌー・カヤックラック; 車載用カーゴラック; 車載用釣り竿ラック; 車載用ガンラック; 車載用バイク・スクーターラック; 車載用スキー・スノーボードラック; 車載用サーフボードラック
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Taşıt Saklama ve Kargo > Motorlu Taşıt Taşıma Ekipmanları: Taşıt Tabanı Taşıma Sistemleri; Taşıt Bisiklet Taşıma Ekipmanları; Tekne Taşıma Aparatları; Port Bagajlar; Araç Olta Taşıma Ekipmanları; Motorlu Taşıt Silah Taşıma Düzenekleri; Taşıt Motosiklet ve Scooter Taşıma Ekipmanları; Taşıt Kayak ve Snowboard Taşıma Ekipmanları; Taşıt Su Sporu Tahtası Taşıma Ekipmanları
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Riešenia uloženia nákladu na vozidle > Nosiče motorových vozidiel: Základné systémy; Nosiče bicyklov; Nosiče lodí; Nákladné nosiče; Nosiče na rybárske prúty; Nosiče na zbrane; Nosiče na motorky a skútre; Nosiče na lyže a snowboardy; Nosiče na vodné bicykle
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Stauraum- & Transportsysteme > Kfz-Gepäckträger: Grundgestelle für Autogepäckträger; Fahrradträger; Autogepäckträger für Kanus & Kajaks; Gepäckträger; Autogepäckträger für Angelruten; Autogewehrhalter; Autogepäckträger für Motorräder & Motorroller; Autogepäckträger für Skier & Snowboards; Autogepäckträger für Surfbretter
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Przewóz i przechowywanie bagażu > Bagażniki samochodowe: Bazowe bagażniki samochodowe; Bagażniki do przewozu rowerów; Bagażniki do przewozu kajaków; Kosze bagażowe; Bagażniki do przewozu sprzętu wędkarskiego; Uchwyty do broni; Bagażniki do przewozu skuterów i motocykli; Bagażniki na sprzęt narciarski i snowboardowy; Bagażniki na deski do sportów wodnych
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Opslag en lading voor voertuigen > Dragers voor motorvoertuigen: Fietsdragers voor voertuigen; Fietsendragers voor voertuigen; Bootdragers voor voertuigen; Bagagerekken voor voertuigen; Hengeldragers voor voertuigen; Wapenrekken voor voertuigen; Motor- en scooterdragers voor voertuigen; Ski- en snowboarddragers voor voertuigen; Surfplankdragers voor voertuigen
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Transporto priemonių krovinių įranga > Motorinių transporto priemonių laikikliai: Transporto priemonių laikiklių pagrindų sistemos; Transporto priemonių dviračių laikikliai; Transporto priemonių valčių laikikliai; Transporto priemonių krovinių laikikliai; Transporto priemonių meškerių laikikliai; Transporto priemonių ginklų laikikliai; Transporto priemonių motociklų ir motorolerių laikikliai; Transporto priemonių slidžių ir snieglenčių laikikliai; Transporto priemonių vandens sporto lentų laikikliai
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Skladištenje i teret vozila > Nosači za motorna vozila: Sustavi krovnih nosača za vozila; Nosači za bicikle za vozila; Nosači za čamce za vozila; Nosači za teret za vozila; Nosači štapova za ribolov za vozila; Nosači za oružje za vozila; Nosači za motocikle i skutere za vozila; Nosači za skije i daske za vozila; Nosači za daske za vodene sportove za vozila
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Accessoires de chargement > Coffres de toit pour voitures: Systèmes de fixation de base sur véhicules; Porte-bagages pour vélos; Barres de toit pour bateaux; Barres de toit; Porte-cannes à pêche pour véhicules; Barres de toit pour fusils; Fixation sur véhicules pour motos et scooters; Fixation sur véhicules pour skis et snowboards; Fixation sur véhicules pour planches de surf
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Товары для перевозки грузов на транспортных средствах > Конструкции для перевозки багажа: Рейлинги для перевозки багажа на крыше; Крепления для перевозки велосипедов; Крепления для перевозки лодок; Багажники-корзины на фаркоп; Крепления для перевозки удочек; Крепления для перевозки оружия; Крепления для перевозки мотоциклов и скутеров; Крепления для перевозки лыж и сноубордов; Крепления для перевозки досок для водных видов спорта
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Vehicle Storage & Cargo > Motor Vehicle Carrying Racks: Vehicle Base Rack Systems; Vehicle Bicycle Racks; Vehicle Boat Racks; Vehicle Cargo Racks; Vehicle Fishing Rod Racks; Vehicle Gun Racks; Vehicle Motorcycle & Scooter Racks; Vehicle Ski & Snowboard Racks; Vehicle Water Sport Board Racks
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 車輛收納空間/載貨車廂 > 汽機車攜車架: 汽車頂架系統; 車用自行車架; 車頂船架; 汽機車貨物架; 汽車專用魚竿架; 車載槍架; 機車架; 滑雪板車頂架; 衝浪板車頂架
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 차량 보관/화물 > 자동차용 캐리어: 차량 지붕 랙 시스템; 차량용 자전거 거치대; 차량용 보트 랙; 차량용 화물대; 차량용 낚싯대 랙; 차량용 총 받침대; 차량용 오토바이/스쿠터 랙; 차량용 스키/스노보드 랙; 차량용 수상 스포츠 보드 랙
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Αποθήκευση & φορτίο οχημάτων > Σχάρες μεταφοράς μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων: Βασικά συστήματα σχαρών οχημάτων; Σχάρες ποδηλάτων οχημάτων; Σχάρες σκαφών οχημάτων; Σχάρες φόρτωσης οχημάτων; Βάσεις καλαμιών ψαρέματος οχημάτων; Θήκες όπλων για οχήματα; Βάσεις για μοτοσικλέτες & σκούτερ σε οχήματα; Βάσεις για σκι & snowboard σε οχήματα; Βάσεις για σανίδες θαλάσσιων σπορ σε οχήματα
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Armazenamento e carga de veículos > Suportes de carga para veículos motorizados: Sistemas de base de suporte para veículos; Porta-bicicletas para veículos; Suportes de barcos para veículos; Suportes de carga para veículos; Suportes de canas de pesca para veículos; Suportes de armas para veículos; Suportes de motas e scooters para veículos; Suportes de esqui/snowboard para veículos; Suportes de pranchas de desportos aquáticos para veículos
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Armazenamento e carga de veículos > Racks de transporte para veículos motorizados: Sistemas de base de racks para veículos; Racks de bicicleta para veículos; Racks de barcos para veículos; Bagageiros para veículos; Racks de vara de pesca para veículos; Racks para armas em veículos; Racks de motocicleta e mobilete para veículos; Racks de esquis e prancha de snowboarding para veículos; Racks de prancha para veículos
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 交通工具储存和载货 > 汽车承载架: 车载基架系统; 汽车自行车架; 车载船架; 汽车行李架; 车载钓鱼竿架; 车载枪架; 车载摩托车/踏板车架; 车载滑雪板/单板架; 车载水上运动板架